Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.400.220

Employee salary or compensation—Limitations respecting.

(1) No school district board of directors or administrators may:

(a) Increase an employee's salary or compensation to include a payment in lieu of providing a fringe benefit; or

(b) Allow any payment to an employee which is partially or fully conditioned on the termination or retirement of the employee, except as provided in subsection (2) of this section.

(2) A school district board of directors may compensate an employee for termination of the employee's contract in accordance with the termination provisions of the contract. If no such provisions exist the compensation must be reasonable based on the proportion of the uncompleted contract. Compensation received under this subsection shall not be included for the purposes of computing a retirement allowance under any public retirement system in this state.

(3) Provisions of any contract in force on March 27, 1982, which conflict with the requirements of this section shall continue in effect until contract expiration. After expiration, any new contract including any renewal, extension, amendment or modification of an existing contract executed between the parties shall be consistent with this section.

[ 1989 c 11 s 5; 1982 1st ex.s. c 10 s 1. Formerly RCW 28A.58.098.]

NOTES:

Severability—1989 c 11: See note following RCW 9A.56.220.

Severability—1982 1st ex.s. c 10: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1982 1st ex.s. c 10 s 3.]